New York, session 2025-2026, S3485.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 4 of subsection (c-1) of section 4903 of the 2 insurance law, as added by chapter 512 of the laws of 2016, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (4) The insured is stable on a prescription drug or drugs selected by 5 their health care professional for the medical condition under consider- 6 ation, provided that this shall not prevent a utilization review agent 7 from [requiring an insured to try an AB-rated generic equivalent prior 8 to providing coverage for the equivalent brand name prescription drug or 9 drugs; or]: 10 (i) requiring an insured to try an AB-rated generic equivalent or an 11 interchangeable biological product prior to providing coverage for the 12 equivalent brand name prescription drug or drugs, or 13 (ii) requiring an insured to try a biosimilar prior to providing 14 coverage for the brand name prescription reference product drug or 15 drugs. 16 § 2. Subparagraph (A) of paragraph 3 of subsection (c) of section 3242 17 of the insurance law, as added by chapter 99 of the laws of 2022, is 18 amended to read as follows: 19 (A) An insurer with a formulary that includes two or more tiers of 20 benefits providing for different deductibles, copayments or coinsurance 21 applicable to prescription drugs in each tier may move a prescription 22 drug to a tier with a larger deductible, copayment or coinsurance if an 23 AB-rated generic equivalent [or], an interchangeable biological product, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03429-04-5 S. 3485--A 2 1 or biosimilar for such prescription drug is added to the formulary at 2 the same time. 3 § 3. Subparagraph (A) of paragraph 3 of subsection (c) of section 4 4329 of the insurance law, as added by chapter 99 of the laws of 2022, 5 is amended to read as follows: 6 (A) A corporation with a formulary that includes two or more tiers of 7 benefits providing for different deductibles, copayments or coinsurance 8 applicable to prescription drugs in each tier may move a prescription 9 drug to a tier with a larger deductible, copayment or coinsurance if an 10 AB-rated generic equivalent [or], an interchangeable biological product, 11 or biosimilar for such prescription drug is added to the formulary at 12 the same time. 13 § 4. Subsection (c) of section 3242 of the insurance law, as added 14 by chapter 99 of the laws of 2022, is relettered subsection (d). 15 § 5. Subsection (c) of section 4329 of the insurance law, as added by 16 chapter 99 of the laws of 2022, is relettered subsection (d). 17 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.